Utah statutes.
41-1a-219.   Change of name -- New registration.
(1)  If the name of any person who has applied for or obtained the
registration of a vehicle is changed  the person shall surrender the last
registration card and file an application for a new registration card.
(2)  The division upon receipt of the required fees shall issue a new
registration card.
